src/morphology/stems/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON quantifiers

üks'+Num:ük NUM_NORUZ  "yksi" ;
kaks'+Num:kak NUM_NORUZ  "kaksi" ;
koume+Num:koume NUM_  "kolme" ;
nell'+Num:nell' NUM_  "kolme" ;
viž+Num:viž NUM_  "kolme" ;
kuz'+Num:kuz' NUM_  "kolme" ;
seičeme+Num:seičeme NUM_  "kolme" ;
kahesa+Num:kahesa NUM_  "kolme" ;
ühesa+Num:ühesa NUM_  "kolme" ;
kümne+Num:kümne NUM_  "kolme" ;
üks'toštkümne+Num:üks'toštkümne NUM_  "yksitoista" ;
kaks'toštkümne+Num:kaks'toštkümne NUM_  "kaksitoista" ;
kaks'kümne+Num:kaks'kümne NUM_  "kaksikymmentä" ;
sada+Num:sada NUM_  "sata" ;
tuha+Num:tuhanD1E1 NUM_  "tuhat" ;
